chamalal.noun.lexd
PATTERNS
NomSg
NomPl
DatGroupCasesSg
GenGroupCasesSg
OblPl


PATTERN NomSg
NomSgForm [<noun><sg><nom>:]

PATTERN NomPl
NomPlForm [<noun><pl><nom>:]

PATTERN DatGroupCasesSg
DatSgStem [<noun><sg>:] DatGroupCases

PATTERN GenGroupCasesSg
OblSgStem [<noun><sg>:] GenGroupCases

PATTERN OblPl
OblPlStem [<noun><pl>:] DatGroupCases|GenGroupCases


LEXICON DatGroupCases
<dat>:лъа
<aff>:хе[gig] #affective case exists only in Gigatlian dialect
<apud.ess>:хе[vgakv] # III in Magomedova, II in Bokarev
<apud.el>:хоо[vgakv]
<apud.lat>:хе[vgakv]
<apud.lat>:хал[vgakv]
<in.ess>:а2[vgakv] # V in Magomedova, III in Bokarev
<in.el>:аноо[vgakv]
<in.lat>:и[vgakv]
<in.lat>:ал[vgakv]

LEXICON GenGroupCases
<erg>:д
<gen>:лI
<gen>:лIе # according to Bokarev
<gen>:лIи # according to Magomedova
<super.ess>:чI[vgakv] # I in Magomedova and in Bokarev
<super.el>:чIоо[vgakv]
<super.lat>:оол[vgakv]
<super.lat>:оо[vgakv]
<cont.ess>:хъ[vgakv] # II in Magomedova and in Bokarev
<cont.ess>:хъе[vgakv]
<cont.el>:хъоо[vgakv]
<cont.lat>:хъе[vgakv]
<cont.lat>:хъал[vgakv]
<inter.ess>:лIа2[vgakv] # IV in Magomedova, III in Bokarev
<inter.el>:лIаноо[vgakv]
<inter.lat>:лIи[vgakv]
<inter.lat>:лIал[vgakv]
<sub.ess>:кьа2[vgakv] # VI in Magomedova, IV in Bokarev
<sub.el>:кьаноо[vgakv]
<sub.lat>:кьи[vgakv]
<sub.lat>:кьал[vgakv]
<loc.ess>:ла[gig] # I in Magomedova
<loc.el>:лур[gig]
<loc.lat>:ла[gig]
<super.ess>:чIу[gig] # II in Magomedova
<super.el>:чIур[gig]
<super.lat>:чIу[gig]
<cont.ess>:хъи[gig] # III in Magomedova
<cont.lat>:хъу[gig]
<apud.ess>:хи[gig] # IV in Magomedova
<apud.el>:хур[gig]
<apud.lat>:ху[gig]
<inter.ess>:лIи[gig] # V in Magomedova
<inter.el>:лIур[gig]
<inter.lat>:лIу[gig]
<in.ess>:ни[gig] # VI in Magomedova
<in.el>:нур[gig]
<in.lat>:ну[gig]
<sub.ess>:кьи[gig] # VII in Magomedova
<sub.el>:кьур[gig]
<sub.lat>:кьу[gig]

LEXICON NomSgForm
а[3]
а2з[4]
а2з[5]
а2зхоша[5]
а2кв[3]
а2квал[5]
а2лълъа[4]
а2цв[3]
аа[5]
абул[5]
абул[5]
ади[4]
азбар[3]
акьв[5]
алаха[3]
ам[3]
ам[3]
амах[3]
анна[4]
апал[5]
ас[3]
аса[5]
аса[5]
атв[5]
ах[4]
ахбаза2[3]
ахва[3]
аххим[4]
ачиргъа2[3]
баай[3]
бааха2[4]
багьа[3]
базар[3]
базар[3]
байда2[3]
бакь[3]
бал[3]
бала[3]
бала[3]
балъа[3]
барт[3]
бата[4]
батӏа[3]
бахь[3]
бац[3]
бацӏа[3]
бачӏв[3]
бегьа2[3]
безу2[3]
бекъулӏ[5]
бекь[3]
бекьв[5]
бекӏвана[3]
бекӏу2[3]
бел[4]
белу2[3]
берекв[3]
бес[3]
бесу2[3]
бехъ[4]
бецв[3]
беча[4]
бечӏи2[4]
бийаца[4]
била[3]
бисӏсӏ[3]
бисӏсӏа[3]
биц[3]
биъи2лъи[4]
босӏсӏ[3]
босӏсӏ[4]
боту2[3]
боч[3]
боша[3]
боша[3]
бошу2-чӏикъ[4]
бугь[3]
бул[3]
бутухх[3]
буцур[3]
буцур[3]
бээл[5]
вагьа[1]
вара2[3]
вац[1]
вацааб[1]
вогьа[4]
воху2-ссапа[4]
воху2[4]
вукь[4]
галъв[5]
гама[3]
ганнв[3]
гарашв[5]
гачӏа[3]
гва2гва[3]
гваб[5]
гегв[3]
гезма[3]
гел[3]
гору2[5]
гошеема[1]
гургу2[3]
гъа2цӏа[3]
гъа2цӏа[3]
гъаай[5]
гъаб[3]
гъабучӏ[3]
гъагъа[3]
гъада[4]
гъадачӏа[3]
гъазв[3]
гъалее[3]
гъамасса[3]
гъварв[5]
гъее[4]
гъеев[3]
гъилв[5]
гъогъв[3]
гъогъма[4]
гъод[5]
гъоц[3]
гъоцӏу2[3]
гъу2гъ[3]
гъун[5]
гъуу2[3]
гьа2къв[3]
гьа2къваза[3]
гьа2кӏв[5]
гьа2кӏва[3]
гьа2ла[5]
гьаа2[1]
гьаа2[3]
гьаб[5]
гьадам[1]
гьакьа[4]
гьакьв[3]
гьакьв[5]
гьал[5]
гьала[4]
гьалв[5]
гьана[3]
гьана[5]
гьаниха[3]
гьаннир[5]
гьанчӏе[4]
гьасӏа[3]
гьасӏа[3]
гьасӏа[3]
гьасӏсӏ[2]
гьасӏсӏ[4]
гьасӏсӏим[3]
гьачӏа[3]
гьекьим[3]
гьекӏв[4]
гьекӏв[5]
гьекӏва[1]
гьи2гьв[3]
гьи2сӏсӏв[5]
гьи2цӏакъв[4]
гьи2цIа[4]
гьигьва2[3]
гьилв[5]
гьим[5]
гьоб[5]
гьодул[5]
гьок[3]
гьу2сӏсӏ[4]
гьу2чӏа[3]
гьу2чӏа[4]
гьума[3]
гьуу2[4]
гӏисси2бехъ[4]
даа2[3]
даа2[4]
дада[4]
джаайлӏв[5]
джаджа[3]
джанавар[3]
джанв[5]
джарв[5]
джиджи2[4]
додра[3]
доо[3]
жуж[3]
жула[4]
жула2[4]
заа[3]
заза[5]
зва2зваракӏв[5]
зее[3]
зин[3]
зихъ[4]
и2гьв[5]
и2гьва[3]
и2лъа[3]
и2са[5]
и2ха[3]
и2цв[3]
игьир[3]
избула[3]
ии2[3]
икве2[4]
ила[2]
илакьар[2]
има[1]
имакьар[1]
инахв[3]
инибагьа[5]
инибикьиннаб[3]
иниссиналӏв[4]
инна[4]
иса[5]
иша[3]
йагь[2]
йакьил[4]
йакӏва[4]
йац[2]
йацааб[2]
йацӏум[4]
йачал[4]
йегъил[4]
йегьи2[4]
йееб[5]
йекьв[5]
йела-квии2[3]
йела[4]
йелалӏ[4]
йелъа[4]
йелъаб[3]
йергъва2[4]
йес[5]
йетӏана[3]
йехъи2[4]
йикь[4]
йикӏкӏв[4]
йикӏул[4]
йичӏа[3]
йэкъмукъ[3]
йэсӏсӏа[4]
каав[3]
кагъат[3]
калам[3]
ква2квал[3]
ква2сса[3]
кваа2-цӏаа[4]
квагь[4]
квакъи2[4]
кварв[3]
кваха[4]
кваша[3]
квекьа[4]
квел[4]
квии2[3]
кечӏ[3]
кира[3]
киса[3]
коба[3]
коба[4]
кор[3]
котӏа[4]
кочул[5]
кулпат[3]
кума[3]
кусс[3]
кучул[5]
къама[3]
къаратӏв[5]
къаркъала[3]
къатв[5]
къва2къва-цора[3]
къва2къва[3]
къваагъа2[3]
къваайкьв[5]
къинв[5]
къиша[3]
къишв[5]
къоб[3]
къогь[3]
къу2къ[5]
къула[3]
къунна[4]
кьа2чӏа[3]
кьа2чӏал[3]
кьебул[5]
кьее[4]
кьее[5]
кьежа2[3]
кьессал[3]
кьессал[3]
кьиби[3]
кьикьил[4]
кьили[3]
кьод[5]
кӏа2з[4]
кӏарт[3]
кӏач[5]
кӏва2кьа[3]
кӏва2кӏварацв[5]
кӏваб[5]
кӏиликӏа[3]
кӏобара[3]
кӏукӏу2[3]
кӏуу2[3]
ла2пушка[3]
лага[3]
лачи2[1]
лъаква[3]
лъал-гьа2кӏва[3]
лъал[3]
лъам[3]
лъасӏсӏв[5]
лъегъи2[4]
лъеди[3]
лъецӏил[3]
лъи2варалӏв[5]
лълъии2[4]
лъум[5]
лъунни[3]
лээ[3]
лӏилӏ[4]
маа[5]
маай[3]
маала[4]
магъал[3]
магь[3]
маза[3]
макьв[5]
макӏа[3]
макӏва[3]
мамаша[3]
мачӏ[1]
мачӏ[2]
мачӏ[3]
маш[3]
мигъа[4]
мигьа[3]
мизатӏв[5]
мийахъв[3]
микъ[3]
микӏссил[5]
милъ[3]
милъ[3]
минна[3]
мисуд[3]
мисӏсӏ[3]
митӏв[5]
мичӏа[3]
мугура[3]
мугъул[3]
мукьул[3]
муса[3]
мусур[3]
муха[3]
мучар[3]
муш[3]
муш[3]
наква[5]
налъ[4]
насӏсӏ[3]
никв[3]
никв[4]
никвал[5]
нисалӏ[3]
ниха[3]
нича[3]
ниша[3]
нур[3]
нусийа[3]
оди-хеди[4]
орба[3]
ордек[3]
орхъи[4]
отул[5]
ош[4]
паласс[3]
папал[3]
пасса2[3]
пепа-квии2[3]
пийа2[3]
пул[3]
рагъ[3]
рагъ[3]
рачч[3]
реки2[4]
ризикъ[4]
саа[3]
салв[5]
сан[5]
сарв[3]
сегьи2[3]
секӏв[3]
сера[4]
синалӏв[5]
ссагӏат[3]
ссалажа[3]
ссапи2[3]
ссее[3]
ссиб[3]
ссии2в[5]
ссим[3]
ссим[3]
ссирв[3]
ссу2ча[4]
ссу2чӏа[4]
ссур[3]
сусукӏ[5]
сӏсӏаа[3]
сӏсӏаа[4]
сӏсӏаа2[4]
сӏсӏан[4]
сӏсӏатӏа2[4]
сӏсӏедв[5]
сӏсӏее[3]
сӏсӏее[4]
сӏсӏера2тӏв[5]
сӏсӏет[4]
сӏсӏехъва[3]
сӏсӏечӏи[3]
сӏсӏиква2[5]
сӏсӏикъва[4]
сӏсӏими[3]
сӏсӏиналӏ[3]
сӏсӏиналӏв[3]
сӏсӏуу2[5]
таай[5]
тавха2[3]
тагума[5]
тан[3]
тарашв[3]
тарпа[3]
тассв[5]
тисӏсӏв[3]
тисӏсӏкӏул[3]
туб[5]
тускур[3]
тусснахъ[3]
тӏамсса[3]
тӏана[3]
тӏогьа[3]
тӏу2тӏ[3]
у2сс[4]
у2сс[4]
у2сс[4]
ун[4]
ун[5]
урдек[3]
устур[4]
хваай[3]
хвам[5]
хими[4]
хоха[3]
хоха[3]
хоша[4]
хул[5]
хусси[4]
ххва2тӏи[4]
ххи2та[4]
ххи2трум[5]
ххи2чӏ[3]
ххи2чӏбакъв[4]
ххол[4]
ххоххатур[3]
хъа2та[3]
хъа2ч[3]
хъабача[5]
хъаз[3]
хъал[3]
хъала[3]
хъарцигъа[3]
хъиза2[3]
хъирмужукъ[5]
хъод[5]
хӏапара[3]
хӏужрукъ[5]
циб[5]
цибакь[3]
цухари[3]
цӏаа[4]
цӏаддура[3]
цӏарагӏ[4]
цӏи2ву[4]
цӏулли[3]
ча2лӏал[5]
чаа[4]
чаг[3]
чад[4]
чакар[3]
чаквмаал[3]
чалахха[4]
чанагъа[3]
чархъ[3]
чархъи2[4]
чача[3]
черх[3]
чесса[3]
чиба[3]
чила[4]
чирахъ[3]
чочра[3]
чӏаав[5]
чӏавар[5]
чӏам[3]
чӏанн[3]
чӏатв[3]
чӏаххвма[3]
чӏачӏа2[5]
чӏекӏва[3]
чӏелв[5]
чӏетв[5]
чӏи2кӏв[3]
чӏива[4]
чӏисс[3]
чӏор[3]
чӏута[3]
эдаб[4]
элмисӏсӏ[4]
элмисӏсӏ[4]
элмитӏв[3]
элълъим[5]
эсиб[3]
эсибзала[4]
эсӏсӏ[5]
эху2лъи[4]
эш[3]
эша[3]
эъа[3]
ээ[3]
